Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Dockets

§ 9-7-171.
General docket.

The clerk shall keep a general docket, in which he shall enter the names of the parties in each case, the time of filing the declaration, indictment, record from inferior courts on appeal or certiorari, petition, plea, or demurrer, and all other papers in the cause, the issuance and return of process, and a note of all judgments rendered therein, by reference to the minute book and page. He shall mark on the papers in every cause the style and number of the suit, and the time when, and the party by whom filed; and he shall not suffer any paper so filed to be withdrawn but by leave of the court, and then only by retaining a copy, to be made at the cost of the party obtaining the leave. All the papers and pleadings filed in a cause shall be kept in the same file, and all the files kept in numerical order. Entries in criminal cases shall not be made on the docket so as to disclose the names of the defendants until their arrest. And the docket shall be duly indexed, both directly and indirectly, in the alphabetical order of the names of each of the parties.

The general docket required to be kept by this section and all other dockets or records required by law to be kept by the circuit clerk may be kept on computer in lieu of any other physical docket, record or well-bound book if all such dockets and records are kept by computer in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Administrative Office of Courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 634; 1906, § 691; Hemingway’s 1917, § 470; 1930, § 479; 1942, § 1417; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 22; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-173.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-7-173. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 3; 1857, ch. 61, art. 20; 1871, § 557; 1880, § 1485; 1892, § 635; 1906, § 692; Hemingway’s 1917, § 471; 1930, § 480; 1942, § 1418]

§ 9-7-175.
Criminal docket.

The clerk shall make out for each term a separate docket of cases begun by indictment, presentment, information, or other proceedings of a criminal nature, in the name or on behalf of the state or any municipal corporation. Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 5; 1857, ch. 61, art. 21; 1871, § 559; 1880, § 1486; 1892, § 636; 1906, § 693; Hemingway’s 1917, § 472; 1930, § 481; 1942, § 1419; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-177.
Appearance docket.

The clerk shall keep an appearance docket, in which he shall enter all civil cases not triable at the first term after they are begun, in the order in which they are commenced, with the date of such commencement. Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 22; 1871, § 558; 1880, § 1487; 1892, § 637; 1906, § 694; Hemingway’s 1917, § 473; 1930, § 482; 1942, § 1420; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 24; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-179.
Subpoena docket.

The clerk shall keep a subpoena docket, in which he shall enter the style and number of each case in which a subpoena for a witness is issued, the name of the party for whom the witness is subpoenaed, to whom the subpoena is directed, the date of its issuance, when returnable, whether or not executed. He shall therein keep an account of all witnesses who may be absent when the case in which they have been subpoenaed is called for trial, or who may disqualify themselves from giving testimony by being intoxicated when such case is tried; and he shall not issue any certificate to such witnesses. The docket shall be kept duly indexed. Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 22; 1871, § 561; 1880, § 1488; 1892, § 638; 1906, § 695; Hemingway’s 1917, § 474; 1930, § 483; 1942, § 1421; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 25; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-7-181.
Execution docket.

The clerk shall keep a docket, in which he shall enter every capias pro finem and all executions issued by him, specifying the names of the parties, the date, the amount of the judgment or decree and of costs, the name of the officer to whom it is delivered, to what county directed, the date when issued, and the return-day thereof; and, when the same is returned, shall, without delay, record the return at large on the same page of the docket. And the execution docket shall be kept duly indexed, both directly and indirectly, in the alphabetical order of the names of each of the parties. Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-7-171.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 268; 1871, § 565; 1880, § 1489; 1892, § 639; 1906, § 696; Hemingway’s 1917, § 475; 1930, § 484; 1942, § 1422; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 26; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.